Maryland, session 2025, HB1207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
3–902.
(a) An elected member of the county board is entitled to reimbursement for travel
and other expenses as provided by the Montgomery County Council.
(b) (1) An elected member of the county board is entitled to receive[:
(i) $25,000 annually as compensation; or] ANNUALLY AS
COMPENSATION:
(I) 1. $25,000, ENDING NOVEMBER 30, 2025;
2. $62,000, BEGINNING DECEMBER 1, 2025; AND
3. $124,000, BEGINNING DECEMBER 1, 2026; OR
(ii) An annual salary set through legislation based on the
recommendations of the Montgomery County Board of Education Compensation
Commission in accordance with Title 28, Subtitle 1A of the Local Government Article.
(2) The president of the county board is entitled to receive[:
– 1 –

Ch. 426 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(i) $29,000 annually as compensation; or] ANNUALLY AS
COMPENSATION:
(I) 1. $29,000, ENDING NOVEMBER 30, 2025;
2. $67,000, BEGINNING DECEMBER 1, 2025; AND
3. $134,000, BEGINNING DECEMBER 1, 2026; OR
(ii) An annual salary set through legislation based on the
recommendations of the Montgomery County Board of Education Compensation
Commission in accordance with Title 28, Subtitle 1A of the Local Government Article.
(3) An elected member is entitled to health insurance and to other fringe
benefits regularly provided to employees of the board of education under the same terms
and conditions extended to other employees of the board of education.
(4) A SALARY INCREASE FOR AN ELECTED MEMBER UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION SHALL TAKE EFFECT AT THE BEGINNING OF THE TERM OF OFFICE AND
MAY NOT INCREASE DURING THE TERM OF OFFICE.
(c) (1) The student member [may not receive compensation but, after
submitting expense vouchers,] may be reimbursed for out–of–pocket expenses incurred in
connection with official duties.
(2) [(i)] A student member who completes a full term on the county board
shall [be granted a scholarship to be applied toward the student’s higher education costs.
(ii) 1. Except as provided in subsubparagraph 2 of this
subparagraph, the scholarship amount is equal to the highest annual resident
undergraduate tuition, mandatory fees, and room and board that is charged at a 4–year
public institution of higher education within the University System of Maryland, other than
the University of Maryland Global Campus and University of Maryland, Baltimore
Campus, for the academic year in which the student member serves on the county board:
(I) MAY BE REIMBURSED FOR OUT–OF–POCKET EXPENSES
INCURRED IN CONNECTION WITH OFFICIAL DUTIES; AND
(II) SHALL BE GRANTED COMPENSATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH
PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) (I) SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE
COMPENSATION AMOUNT OF THE STUDENT MEMBER IS EQUAL TO THE HIGHEST
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 426
ANNUAL RESIDENT UNDERGRADUATE TUITION, MANDATORY FEES, AND ROOM AND
BOARD THAT IS CHARGED AT A 4–YEAR PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION
WITHIN THE UNIVERSITY SYSTEM OF MARYLAND, OTHER THAN THE UNIVERSITY OF
MARYLAND GLOBAL CAMPUS AND UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, BALTIMORE
CAMPUS, FOR THE ACADEMIC YEAR IN WHICH THE STUDENT MEMBER SERVES ON
THE COUNTY BOARD.
(II) 1. SUBJECT TO SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH, THE STUDENT MEMBER MAY ELECT TO RECEIVE COMPENSATION
GRANTED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION IN MONTHLY INSTALLMENTS AS A STIPEND
DURING THE STUDENT MEMBER’S TERM AND RECEIVE ANY REMAINING AMOUNT AS
A SCHOLARSHIP AFTER THE END OF THE TERM.
2. The amount of a scholarship COMPENSATION granted
under this subsection in any year may not exceed the amount that an elected member of
the county board is entitled to receive under subsection (b) of this section in that year.]
RECEIVE AS FOLLOWS:
(I) THROUGH THE TERM THAT ENDS IN 2026, A SCHOLARSHIP
EQUAL TO 40% OF THE ANNUAL COMPENSATION OF AN ELECTED MEMBER OF THE
COUNTY BOARD FOR THAT YEAR TO BE APPLIED TOWARD THE STUDENT’S HIGHER
EDUCATION COSTS AND A ONE–TIME STIPEND EQUAL TO 10% OF THE ANNUAL
COMPENSATION OF AN ELECTED MEMBER OF THE COUNTY BOARD; AND
(II) BEGINNING WITH THE TERM THAT STARTS IN 2026, A
SCHOLARSHIP EQUAL TO 80% OF THE ANNUAL COMPENSATION OF AN ELECTED
MEMBER OF THE COUNTY BOARD FOR THAT YEAR TO BE APPLIED TOWARD THE
STUDENT’S HIGHER EDUCATION COSTS AND A ONE–TIME STIPEND EQUAL TO 20% OF
THE ANNUAL COMPENSATION OF AN ELECTED MEMBER OF THE COUNTY BOARD.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, in accordance with Article
III, § 35 of the Maryland Constitution, this Act may not be construed to extend or apply to
the salary or compensation of the president and members of the Montgomery County Board
of Education while serving in a term of office beginning before the effective date of this Act,
but the provisions of this Act concerning the salary or compensation of the president and
members of the Montgomery County Board of Education shall take effect at the beginning
of the next following term of office. This limitation does not apply to an individual appointed
or elected after the effective date of this Act to fill out an unexpired term.
SECTION 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 3 –